Louisiana, session 2026, HB935.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5002(E)(3)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§5002. Awards and amounts
* * *
E.
* * *
(3)(a) Any student receiving an Opportunity, Performance, Honors, or
Excellence Award who successfully completes an academic undergraduate degree
in less than the eight semesters or its equivalent of award benefits provided by this
Subsection shall be eligible to continue to receive all applicable award benefits, in
accordance with the limitations as specified in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph,
for any remaining semester or semesters or the equivalent thereof of eligibility not
used to obtain the undergraduate degree if the student pursues a postgraduate
academic degree at an eligible institution and the student continues to meet all
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-609 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 935
academic and other requirements provided by this Section and by rule of the
administering agency for continued receipt of the award as an undergraduate except
as such requirements, including requirements provided by this Section for
undergraduate students, may be modified by the administering agency as necessary
to apply such requirements to postgraduate study. For purposes of this
Subparagraph, "eligible institution" shall include any nonpublic postsecondary
education institution that meets all of the following criteria:
(i) The institution is not a member of the Louisiana Association of
Independent Colleges and Universities.
(ii) The institution offers a graduate program in medical sciences.
(iii) The institution has been physically collocated with a public
postsecondary education institution in Louisiana since 2020.
(iv) The institution bills tuition and fees through the public postsecondary
education institution with which it is physically collocated.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.